Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 5 Registration, Licenses, and Permits Generally

2-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Department of Agriculture Registration, License, and Permit Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 307, § 1.

2-5-2.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to all applications to the department for registrations, licenses, or permits required by law or regulation.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 307, § 2.

2-5-3.
Applications — Designation of address or agent for service of process; forwarding to Secretary of State.

All applications to the department for registrations, licenses, or permits shall:

Designate an address in this state where the applicant can be personally served with legal process;

Contain an appointment of an agent in this state for acceptance of service of legal process, together with the agent’s address in this state; or

Contain a designation of the Secretary of State for acceptance of service of legal process.

A copy of such application shall be forwarded to the Secretary of State by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 307, § 3.

2-5-4.
Applications — Admission that applicant is doing business in state.

The filing of an application with the department for registration, a license, or a permit shall constitute an admission by the applicant that the applicant is doing business in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 307, § 4.

2-5-4.1.
Applications — Form of submission; payment of fees.

The department is authorized to accept applications either in writing or through available electronic media approved by the Commissioner. The payment of fees and the acceptance of such fees by the department may be accomplished in any manner, including electronic fund transfers, approved by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-5-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 401, § 1.

2-5-5.
Grounds for denial of registration, license, or permit; hearing.

The Commissioner may deny registration, a license, or a permit to:

Any applicant with a criminal record;

Any applicant who is found by the Commissioner to have violated any law administered by the department or any regulation or quarantine of the department;

A corporation, when any of its officers has a criminal record or is found by the Commissioner to have violated any law administered by the department or any regulation or quarantine of the department; or

Any person who is less than 18 years of age on the date of his or her application.

In the case of a partnership, all parties shall be considered applicants for the purpose of this Code section.

No registration, license, or permit shall be denied under this Code section without opportunity for hearing in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 307, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 401, § 2.

2-5-6.
Grounds for revocation; hearing.

The Commissioner may revoke any outstanding registration, license, or permit where the holder of the same or any officer or agent of the holder is found by the Commissioner to have violated any law administered by the department or any regulation or quarantine of the department, provided that no registration, license, or permit shall be revoked under this Code section without opportunity for hearing in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 307, § 6.

Cross references.

Authority of Commissioner to impose penalty in lieu of other action, §

2-2-10

.

2-5-7.
Registration, license, or permit certificates as evidence thereof; republication and reissuance unnecessary.

All license, registration, and permit certificates published by the department shall, upon issuance, be permanent evidence of the pertinent licenses, registrations, and permits they are published for, until their surrender, abandonment, revocation, cancellation, or nonrenewal. No subsequent republication and reissuance of certificates for periodically renewable licenses, registrations, and permits by the department shall be necessary; provided, however, that all conditions and fees required by law for sustained effectiveness and renewal must be satisfied for continued enjoyment of the pertinent license, registration, or permit.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 187, § 1.

2-5-8.
Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner shall make and publish in print or electronically such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, as he deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 307, § 7; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.